Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1796YH (2) 91 ll/js H.F. 159 Section 1. Section 364.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 20. A city shall not adopt or enforce an 3 ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment that restricts 4 an owner of real property located in a district zoned for 5 residential use with a speed limit of twenty-five miles per 6 hour or less from growing purposely planted vegetation that is 7 forty-two inches or less in height. 8